District of Columbia statutes.
7-202

Vital records system established.

The Mayor shall establish a vital records system consistent with this chapter for the reporting, maintenance, issuance, and confidentiality of vital records.

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 3, 28 DCR 3271
This section is referenced in § 7-228.
1981 Ed., § 6-202.